Utah statutes.
77-7-13.   Arrest without warrant by peace officer -- Reasonable grounds, what constitutes -- Exemption from civil or criminal liability.

(1)  A peace officer may arrest, without warrant, any person the officer has reasonable ground to believe has committed a theft under Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 8, Library Theft, or of goods held or displayed for sale.

(2)  A charge of theft made to a peace officer under Part 8, Library Theft, by an employee of a library, or by a merchant, merchant's employee, servant, or agent constitutes a reasonable ground for arrest, and the peace officer is relieved from any civil or criminal liability.



Amended by Chapter 282, 1998 General Session

